Ohio, session 136, SB90.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 1357.01, 1357.02, 1357.03, 8
1357.04, 1357.05, 1357.06, 1357.07, 1357.08, 1357.09, 1357.10, 9
1357.11, and 1357.12 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as 10
follows: 11
Sec. 1357.01. As used in this chapter : 12
(A) "Advisory committee" means the universal regulatory 13
sandbox program advisory committee established under section 14
1357.03 of the Revised Code. 15
(B) "Applicable agency" means a department or agency of 16
the state that by law regulates a business activity and persons 17
engaged in such business activity, including the issuance of 18

S. B. No. 90 Page 2
As Introduced
licenses or other types of authorization, which the regulatory 19
relief division determines would otherwise regulate a sandbox 20
participant. 21
(C) "Business day" means any day of the week, excluding 22
Saturday, Sunday, and a legal holiday, as defined in section 23
1.14 of the Revised Code. 24
(D) "Common sense initiative office" means the office 25
established by the governor under section 107.61 of the Revised 26
Code. 27
(E) "Consumer" means a person that purchases or otherwise 28
enters into a transaction or agreement to receive an offering 29
pursuant to a demonstration by a sandbox participant. 30
(F) "Demonstrate" or "demonstration" means to temporarily 31
provide an offering in accordance with the provisions of the 32
universal regulatory sandbox program described in this chapter. 33
(G) "Innovation" means the use or incorporation of a new 34
idea, a new or emerging technology, or a new use of existing 35
technology to address a problem, provide a benefit, or otherwise 36
offer a product, production method, or service. 37
(H) "Innovative offering" means an offering that includes 38
an innovation. 39
(I)(1) "Product" means a commercially distributed good 40
that is all of the following: 41
(a) Tangible personal property; 42
(b) The result of a production process; 43
(c) Passed through the distribution channel before 44
consumption. 45

S. B. No. 90 Page 3
As Introduced
(2) "Product" does not include either of the following: 46
(a) Beer or wine, as defined in section 4301.01 of the 47
Revised Code; 48
(b) Motor vehicles, as defined in section 4501.01 of the 49
Revised Code. 50
(J) "Production" means the method or process of creating 51
or obtaining a good, which may include assembling, breeding, 52
capturing, collecting, extracting, fabricating, farming, 53
fishing, gathering, growing, harvesting, hunting, manufacturing, 54
mining, processing, raising, or trapping a good. 55
(K) "Sandbox participant" means a person whose application 56
to participate in the universal regulatory sandbox is approved 57
in accordance with this chapter. 58
(L) "Service" means any commercial activity, duty, or 59
labor performed for another person, except for either of the 60
following: 61
(1) The activities regulated by Title XLIII of the Revised 62
Code to the extent that those activities pertain to the 63
distribution or sale of beer or wine; 64
(2) The activities regulated by Chapter 4517. of the 65
Revised Code. 66
Sec. 1357.02. (A) The common sense initiative office shal l 67
establish a universal regulatory sandbox program in consultation 68
with applicable agencies to enable a person to obtain limited 69
access to the market in this state to test products or services 70
without obtaining any other license or authorization that 71
otherwise would be required. 72
(B) The governor shall establish a regulatory relief 73

S. B. No. 90 Page 4
As Introduced
division within the common sense initiative office for the 74
purposes of administering this chapter and acting as a liaison 75
between private businesses and applicable agencies to identify 76
state laws or regulations that could potentially be waived or 77
suspended under the universal regulatory sandbox program. 78
(C) The regulatory relief division may do all of the 79
following: 80
(1) Identify state laws and regulations that unnecessarily 81
inhibit the creation and success of new companies or industries 82
in this state and provide recommendations to the governor and 83
the general assembly on modifying such state laws and 84
regulations; 85
(2) Create a framework for analyzing the risk level to the 86
health, safety, and financial well-being of consumers as a 87
result of permanently removing or temporarily waiving laws and 88
regulations that inhibit the creation or success of new and 89
existing companies or industries in this state; 90
(3) Propose potential reciprocity agreements between 91
states that use or are proposing to use similar universal 92
regulatory sandbox programs as described in this chapter or 93
Chapter 1355. of the Revised Code; 94
(4) Adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the 95
Revised Code as necessary to do either of the following: 96
(a) Administering the universal regulatory sandbox 97
program, including the application process and the reporting 98
requirements of sandbox participants; 99
(b) Cooperating and consulting with the superintendent of 100
financial institutions respecting the regulatory sandbox program 101
authorized by Chapter 1355. of the Revised Code. 102

S. B. No. 90 Page 5
As Introduced
Sec. 1357.03. (A) The universal regulatory sandbox progra m 103
advisory committee is established within the common sense 104
initiative office. The committee shall advise and make 105
recommendations to the regulatory relief division as described 106
in this chapter. 107
(B) The committee shall consist of the following members: 108
(1) Six members who represent business interests from a 109
variety of industry clusters, appointed by the governor; 110
(2) Three members who represent state agencies that 111
regulate businesses, appointed by the governor; 112
(3) One member of the senate, appointed by the president 113
of the senate; 114
(4) One member of the house of representatives, appointed 115
by the speaker of the house of representatives. 116
(C)(1) Members of the committee shall be appointed not 117
later than thirty days after the effective date of this section. 118
Members of the committee serve at the pleasure of the member's 119
appointing authority. Any vacancy in the membership of the 120
committee shall be filled within sixty days after the vacancy 121
occurs in the same manner as the original appointment. 122
(2) Of the initial appointments made by the governor to 123
the committee: 124
(a) Three of the members described in division (B)(1) of 125
this section and two of the members described in division (B)(2) 126
of this section shall serve for a term ending the first day of 127
the second calendar year that begins after the effective date of 128
this section; 129
(b) Three of the members described in division (B)(1) of 130

S. B. No. 90 Page 6
As Introduced
this section and one of the members described in division (B)(2) 131
of this section shall serve for a term ending the first day of 132
the fourth calendar year that begins after the effective date of 133
this section. 134
(3) After the initial appointments, terms for all members 135
appointed by the governor shall be four years, with each term 136
ending on the same day of the same month as did the term it 137
succeeds. 138
(4) Legislative members of the committee shall serve terms 139
of two years or for the remainder of the member's legislative 140
term, whichever is less. 141
(D) Members of the committee shall serve without 142
compensation but may be reimbursed for expenses actually 143
incurred in the performance of their duties, within the limits 144
of funds available to the committee for such purposes. 145
(E) The governor shall select a chairperson for the 146
committee on an annual basis. The committee shall meet at the 147
call of the chairperson. The initial meeting shall not be later 148
than thirty days after the last member is appointed. A majority 149
of the members of the committee constitutes a quorum for the 150
transaction of the business of the committee. 151
(F) The staff of the regulatory relief division shall 152
provide technical and administrative support as needed by the 153
committee. 154
(G) The committee is not a public body for the purposes of 155
section 121.22 of the Revised Code. 156
Sec. 1357.04. On or before October 1 of the first year 157
that begins after the effective date of this section, and 158
annually thereafter, the common sense initiative office shall 159

S. B. No. 90 Page 7
As Introduced
submit a written report on the activities of the regulatory 160
relief division to the general assembly in accordance with 161
section 101.68 of the Revised Code. The report shall include all 162
of the following: 163
(A) Information regarding each participant in the 164
universal regulatory sandbox program, including which industry 165
each participant represents and the anticipated or actual cost 166
savings that each participant experiences; 167
(B) Recommended changes to laws or regulations that the 168
regulatory relief division determines unnecessarily inhibit the 169
creation and success of new companies or industries; 170
(C) Information on the universal regulatory sandbox 171
program's impact on consumer outcomes; 172
(D) Recommended changes to the universal regulatory 173
sandbox program or the regulatory relief division. 174
Sec. 1357.05. (A) A person that seeks to participate in 175
the universal regulatory sandbox program shall apply to the 176
regulatory relief division in a form and manner prescribed by 177
the division. The application shall, at minimum, include all of 178
the following: 179
(1) Confirmation that the applicant is subject to the 180
jurisdiction of the common sense initiative office, which may be 181
demonstrated through incorporation, residency, an agreement with 182
the office by which the applicant agrees to be subject to the 183
laws and courts of this state relating to any action arising out 184
of the applicant's demonstration of a product or service in the 185
universal regulatory sandbox, or otherwise; 186
(2) Confirmation that the applicant has established a 187
physical or virtual location in the state, from which the 188

S. B. No. 90 Page 8
As Introduced
demonstration of an innovative offering will be developed and 189
performed and where all required records, documents, and data 190
will be maintained; 191
(3) Relevant personal and contact information for the 192
applicant, including legal names, addresses, telephone numbers, 193
electronic mail addresses, web site addresses, and other 194
information that may be required by the regulatory relief 195
division; 196
(4) Disclosure of criminal convictions, if any, of the 197
applicant and other participating personnel; 198
(5) A description of the innovative offering to be 199
demonstrated, including statements regarding all of the 200
following: 201
(a) How the offering is subject to licensing, legal 202
prohibition, or other authorization requirements outside of the 203
universal regulatory sandbox; 204
(b) Each law or regulation that the applicant seeks to 205
have waived or suspended while participating in the universal 206
regulatory sandbox program; 207
(c) How the offering would benefit consumers; 208
(d) How the offering is different from other offerings 209
available in this state; 210
(e) What risks might exist for consumers that use or 211
purchase the offering; 212
(f) How participating in the regulatory sandbox would 213
enable a successful demonstration of the offering; 214
(g) A description of the proposed demonstration plan, 215

S. B. No. 90 Page 9
As Introduced
including estimated time periods for beginning and ending the 216
demonstration; 217
(h) Recognition that the applicant will be subject to all 218
laws and regulations pertaining to the applicant's offering 219
after conclusion of the demonstration; 220
(i) How the applicant will end the demonstration and 221
protect consumers if the demonstration fails. 222
(6) A list of the state agencies that regulate the 223
applicant's business; 224
(7) Other information that may be required by the 225
regulatory relief division. 226
(B) The regulatory relief division shall, upon request, 227
consult with persons interested in participating in the 228
universal regulatory sandbox program and assist such persons in 229
preparing an application, including by helping to identify state 230
agencies that regulate the person's business and laws or 231
regulations that could have an adverse impact on the success of 232
that business and which the person may seek to have waived or 233
suspended while participating in the universal regulatory 234
sandbox program. 235
(C) The governor may require an application fee to offset 236
the costs of the regulatory relief division and the common sense 237
initiative office in administering the universal regulatory 238
sandbox program. All fees collected under this section shall be 239
deposited to the universal regulatory sandbox program fund, 240
which is created in the state treasury, and used for the 241
purposes of this chapter. 242
(D) An applicant shall file a separate application for 243
each innovative offering that the applicant seeks to 244

S. B. No. 90 Page 10
As Introduced
demonstrate. 245
(E) After an application is filed, the regulatory relief 246
division shall do all of the following: 247
(1) Keep confidential the contents of the application and 248
any related information provided by the applicant; 249
(2) Consult with each applicable government agency that 250
regulates the applicant's business regarding the application and 251
whether more information is needed from the applicant; 252
(3) Seek any additional information from the applicant 253
that the regulatory relief division determines is necessary. 254
(F) Not later than five business days after the date a 255
complete application is received by the regulatory relief 256
division, the division shall do both of the following: 257
(1) Review the application and refer it to each applicable 258
state agency that regulates the applicant's business; 259
(2) Provide the applicant with an acknowledgment of 260
receipt of the application and the identity and contact 261
information for each state agency to which the application has 262
been referred for review. 263
(G) Applications received under this section are not 264
public records for the purposes of Chapter 149. of the Revised 265
Code. 266
Sec. 1357.06. (A)(1) Subject to division (A)(2) of this 267
section, not later than thirty business days after the date on 268
which an applicable agency receives a complete application under 269
section 1357.05 of the Revised Code for review, the applicable 270
agency shall provide a written report to the regulatory relief 271
division of the applicable agency's findings. The report shall 272

S. B. No. 90 Page 11
As Introduced
include both of the following: 273
(a) A description of any identifiable, likely, and 274
significant harm to the health, safety, or financial well-being 275
of consumers that the law or regulation the applicant seeks to 276
waive or suspend protects against; 277
(b) A recommendation to the regulatory relief division 278
that the applicant either be admitted or denied entrance into 279
the universal regulatory sandbox. 280
(2) The applicable agency may extend the deadline for 281
delivering the written report required by division (A)(1) of 282
this section by an additional five business days by providing 283
notice of the extension to the regulatory relief division. The 284
applicable agency shall not extend the deadline more than once 285
for each application. 286
(3) If the applicable agency recommends an applicant under 287
this section be denied entrance into the universal regulatory 288
sandbox, the written report shall include a description of the 289
reasons for the recommendation, including why a temporary waiver 290
or suspension of the relevant laws or regulations would 291
potentially significantly harm the health, safety, or financial 292
well-being of consumers or the public, or create unreasonable 293
expenses for the taxpayers of this state, and the likelihood of 294
such harm or expenses. 295
(4) If the applicable agency determines that the 296
consumer's or public's health, safety, or financial well-being 297
can be protected through less restrictive means than the 298
existing relevant laws or regulations, then the applicable 299
agency shall provide a recommendation of how that may be 300
achieved. 301

S. B. No. 90 Page 12
As Introduced
(5) If an applicable agency fails to deliver a written 302
report as required by this section, the regulatory relief 303
division shall proceed as though the applicable agency does not 304
object to the temporary waiver or suspension of the relevant 305
laws or regulations for an applicant seeking to participate in 306
the universal regulatory sandbox. 307
(B) The regulatory relief division shall immediately 308
reject an application if any of the following apply: 309
(1) An applicable agency determines, in the agency's sole 310
discretion, that the applicant's offering fails to comply with 311
standards or specifications required by federal law or 312
regulations; 313
(2) An applicable agency timely recommends that the 314
applicant be denied entrance to the universal regulatory sandbox 315
in the agency's written report under division (A) of this 316
section and provides the applicant with the reasons for that 317
determination in accordance with that division; 318
(3) The regulatory relief division determines that the 319
applicant is better suited for the regulatory sandbox program 320
authorized by Chapter 1355. of the Revised Code; 321
(4) The applicant or any person who seeks to participate 322
with the applicant in demonstrating an offering has been 323
convicted, entered a plea of nolo contendere, or entered a plea 324
of guilty or nolo contendere held in abeyance, for any crime 325
involving significant theft, fraud, or dishonesty. 326
(C)(1) The regulatory relief division shall provide all 327
applications received under section 1357.05 of the Revised Code 328
and written reports received under this section, other than 329
those rejected under division (B) of this section, to the 330

S. B. No. 90 Page 13
As Introduced
universal regulatory sandbox program advisory committee. 331
(2) The universal regulatory sandbox program advisory 332
committee shall meet to review an application and any 333
corresponding reports not less than thirty days, and not more 334
than one hundred twenty days, after receiving the application 335
from the regulatory relief division under division (C)(1) of 336
this section. 337
(3) Subject to divisions (C)(2) and (4) of this section, 338
the universal regulatory sandbox program advisory committee 339
shall meet not less than one time per calendar quarter. 340
(4) The committee may cancel a meeting otherwise required 341
by division (C)(3) of this section if no applications are 342
available for review. 343
(5) After reviewing an application and the corresponding 344
reports of applicable agencies, the committee shall provide the 345
governor and the common sense initiative office the committee's 346
recommendation that the applicant either be admitted or denied 347
entrance into the universal regulatory sandbox. 348
(D) The universal regulatory sandbox program advisory 349
committee shall consider all of the following in determining 350
whether to recommend that an applicant be admitted to the 351
universal regulatory sandbox: 352
(1) Whether the applicable agency has previously issued a 353
license or other authorization to the applicant; 354
(2) Whether the applicable agency has previously 355
investigated, sanctioned, or pursued legal action against the 356
applicant; 357
(3) Whether a competitor to the applicant is or has been a 358

S. B. No. 90 Page 14
As Introduced
universal regulatory sandbox participant; 359
(4) Whether the applicant's plan adequately protects 360
consumers from potential harm; 361
(5) The risk of harm to consumers as compared to the 362
potential benefits of the applicant's participation in the 363
universal regulatory sandbox. 364
(E)(1) The regulatory relief division, the common sense 365
initiative office, or the governor may deny any application 366
submitted under this chapter for any reason, including if the 367
division, office, or governor determines that the preponderance 368
of evidence demonstrates that suspending or waiving enforcement 369
of a law or regulation would cause a significant risk of harm to 370
consumers or residents of the state. 371
(2) If the division, office, or governor denies an 372
application under division (E)(1) or (B) of this section, the 373
division shall provide to the applicant a written description of 374
the reasons for not allowing the applicant to participate in the 375
universal regulatory sandbox. 376
(3) The division's, office's, or governor's determination 377
to deny an application is final. 378
Sec. 1357.07. (A)(1) Subject to division (B) of section 379
1357.06 of the Revised Code, upon receiving a recommendation to 380
approve an application from the universal regulatory sandbox 381
program advisory committee, the regulatory relief division, in 382
consultation with the governor, may enter into a written 383
agreement with the applicant admitting the applicant to the 384
universal regulatory sandbox and describing the specific laws 385
and regulations that are waived or suspended as part of the 386
applicant's participation therein. 387

S. B. No. 90 Page 15
As Introduced
(2) The sandbox participant may demonstrate the offering 388
described in the sandbox participant's application, as described 389
in the agreement, for five years following the date the 390
agreement is entered. 391
(3) An agreement under this section that waives or 392
suspends a law or regulation does so only with respect to 393
consumers who are residents of this state. 394
(4) An agreement under this section does not restrict a 395
sandbox participant that holds a license or other authorization 396
in another state or jurisdiction from acting in accordance with 397
that license or other authorization. 398
(B) The regulatory relief division shall not enter into a 399
written agreement with an applicant that waives or suspends 400
either of the following: 401
(1) Any tax levied by this state or a taxing authority of 402
this state, as defined in section 5705.01 of the Revised Code; 403
(2) A law or regulation that allows a consumer to seek 404
restitution in the event that the consumer is harmed. 405
(C) A sandbox participant is deemed to possess an 406
appropriate license or other authorization under the laws of 407
this state for the purposes of any provision of federal law 408
requiring licensure or other authorization by the state. 409
(D) Subject to division (E) of this section, all of the 410
following apply: 411
(1) During the demonstration period, a sandbox participant 412
is not subject to the enforcement of state laws or regulations 413
waived or suspended pursuant to the written agreement between 414
the regulatory relief division and the sandbox participant. 415

S. B. No. 90 Page 16
As Introduced
(2) A prosecutor shall not file or pursue charges 416
pertaining to a law or regulation waived or suspended pursuant 417
to that agreement that occurs during the demonstration period. 418
(3) A state agency shall not file or pursue any punitive 419
action against a sandbox participant, including a fine or 420
license suspension or revocation, for the violation of a law or 421
regulation waived or suspended pursuant to that agreement that 422
occurs during the demonstration period. 423
(E) A sandbox participant does not have immunity related 424
to any criminal offense committed during the sandbox 425
participant's participation in the universal regulatory sandbox. 426
(F) By written notice, the regulatory relief division may 427
end a sandbox participant's participation in the universal 428
regulatory sandbox at any time and for any reason, including if 429
the division, the common sense initiative office, or the 430
governor determines that a sandbox participant is not operating 431
in good faith to bring an innovative offering to market. 432
(G) Neither the regulatory relief division nor its 433
employees are liable for any business losses or the recouping of 434
application expenses or other expenses related to the regulatory 435
sandbox, including either of the following: 436
(1) Denying an applicant's application to participate in 437
the universal regulatory sandbox for any reason; 438
(2) Ending a sandbox participant's participation in the 439
regulatory sandbox at any time and for any reason. 440
Sec. 1357.08. (A) Before demonstrating an offering to a 441
consumer, a sandbox participant shall disclose all of the 442
following to the consumer: 443

S. B. No. 90 Page 17
As Introduced
(1) The name and contact information of the sandbox 444
participant; 445
(2) That the offering is authorized pursuant to the 446
universal regulatory sandbox and, if applicable, that the 447
sandbox participant does not have a license or other 448
authorization to provide an offering under state laws that 449
regulate offerings outside of the universal regulatory sandbox; 450
(3) That the offering is undergoing testing and may not 451
function as intended and may expose the consumer to certain 452
risks as identified by the applicable agency's written report; 453
(4) That the provider of the offering is not immune from 454
civil liability for any losses or damages caused by the 455
offering; 456
(5) That the provider of the offering is not immune from 457
criminal prosecution for violations of state law or regulations 458
that are not suspended or waived as allowed by the universal 459
regulatory sandbox; 460
(6) That the offering is a temporary demonstration that 461
may be discounted at the end of the demonstration period; 462
(7) The expected end date of the demonstration period; 463
(8) That a consumer may contact the regulatory relief 464
division and file a complaint regarding the offering being 465
demonstrated and provide the regulatory relief division's 466
telephone number and web site address where a complaint may be 467
filed. 468
(B) The disclosures required by division (A) of this 469
section shall be provided to a consumer in a clear and 470
conspicuous form and, for an internet or application-based 471

S. B. No. 90 Page 18
As Introduced
offering, a consumer shall acknowledge receipt of the disclosure 472
before any transaction may be completed. 473
(C) The regulatory relief division may require that a 474
sandbox participant make additional disclosures to a consumer. 475
Sec. 1357.09. (A) At least thirty days before the end of 476
the demonstration period, a sandbox participant shall either 477
seek an extension in accordance with section 1357.10 of the 478
Revised Code or notify the regulatory relief division that the 479
sandbox participant will exit the regulatory sandbox and 480
discontinue the sandbox participant's demonstration after the 481
day on which the demonstration period ends. 482
(B) Subject to division (C) of this section, if the 483
regulatory relief division does not receive the notification 484
required by division (A) of this section, the regulatory sandbox 485
demonstration period ends five years following the date the 486
agreement described under section 1357.07 of the Revised Code is 487
entered. 488
(C) If a demonstration includes an offering that requires 489
ongoing duties, the sandbox participant shall continue to 490
fulfill those duties after the regulatory sandbox demonstration 491
period ends. 492
Sec. 1357.10. A sandbox participant may request an 493
extension of the universal regulatory sandbox demonstration 494
period not later than thirty days before the end of that period. 495
The regulatory relief division shall grant or deny a request for 496
an extension before the end of the demonstration period. If the 497
regulatory relief division grants the request, the division 498
shall specify the duration of the extension, which shall not be 499
more than twelve months after the date the regulatory sandbox 500

S. B. No. 90 Page 19
As Introduced
demonstration period would have otherwise ended. The regulatory 501
relief division shall not approve more than three extensions, 502
each having a duration of not more than twelve months, for the 503
same sandbox participant respecting the same demonstration. 504
Sec. 1357.11. (A) A sandbox participant shall retain 505
records, documents, and data produced in the ordinary course of 506
business regarding an offering demonstrated in the universal 507
regulatory sandbox. 508
(B) If a sandbox participant ceases to provide an offering 509
before the end of a demonstration period, the sandbox 510
participant shall notify the regulatory relief division and each 511
applicable agency and report on actions taken by the sandbox 512
participant to ensure consumers have not been harmed as a 513
result. The regulatory relief division shall establish quarterly 514
reporting requirements for a sandbox participant, including 515
information about any consumer complaints. 516
(C) The regulatory relief division may request records, 517
documents, and data from a sandbox participant and, upon the 518
regulatory relief division's request, the sandbox participant 519
shall make such records, documents, and data available for 520
inspection by the regulatory relief division. 521
(D) The sandbox participant shall notify the regulatory 522
relief division and each applicable agency of any incidents that 523
result in harm to the health, safety, or financial well-being of 524
a consumer. If a sandbox participant fails to notify the 525
regulatory relief division and each applicable agency of any 526
incidents as described in division (D)(1) of this section, or 527
the regulatory relief division or an applicable agency has 528
evidence that significant harm to a consumer has occurred, the 529
regulatory relief division may immediately remove the sandbox 530

S. B. No. 90 Page 20
As Introduced
participant from the universal regulatory sandbox. 531
(E) Not later than thirty days after the date on which a 532
sandbox participant exits the regulatory sandbox, the sandbox 533
participant shall submit a written report to the regulatory 534
relief division and each applicable agency describing the 535
sandbox participant's demonstration, including all of the 536
following: 537
(1) Any incidents of harm to consumers; 538
(2) Any legal action filed against the sandbox participant 539
as a result of the participant's demonstration; 540
(3) Any complaints filed with an applicable agency as a 541
result of the sandbox participant's demonstration. 542
(F) Not later than thirty days after the date on which an 543
applicable agency receives a quarterly reporting or written 544
report from a sandbox participant as required by this section, 545
the applicable agency shall provide a written report to the 546
regulatory relief division on the demonstration that describes 547
any statutory or regulatory reform the applicable agency 548
recommends as a result of the demonstration. 549
(G) The regulatory relief division may remove a sandbox 550
participant from the universal regulatory sandbox at any time if 551
the regulatory relief division determines that a sandbox 552
participant has engaged in, is engaging in, or is about to 553
engage in any practice or transaction that is in violation of 554
this chapter or that constitutes a violation of a law or 555
regulation for which suspension or waiver has not been granted. 556
Sec. 1357.12. (A) The regulatory relief division shall 557
create and maintain a publicly accessible page on the common 558
sense initiative office's web site that invites residents and 559

S. B. No. 90 Page 21
As Introduced
businesses in this state to make suggestions regarding laws and 560
regulations that could be modified or eliminated to reduce the 561
regulatory burden of residents and businesses in the state. 562
(B) On at least a quarterly basis, the regulatory relief 563
division shall compile the results of suggestions from the web 564
page and provide a written report to the governor and the 565
general assembly, in accordance with section 101.68 of the 566
Revised Code, that describes the most common suggestions. 567
(C) In creating the report, the regulatory relief division 568
and the advisory committee shall ensure that private information 569
of residents and businesses that make suggestions on the web 570
page is not made public. The regulatory relief division may 571
evaluate the suggestions and provide analysis and suggestions 572
regarding which state laws and regulations could be modified or 573
eliminated to reduce the regulatory burden of residents and 574
businesses in the state while still protecting consumers. 575